Utah statutes.
16-10a-1405.   Effect of dissolution.

(1)  A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

(a)  collecting its assets;

(b)  disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its shareholders;

(c)  discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

(d)  distributing its remaining property among its shareholders according to their interests; and

(e)  doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

(2)  Dissolution of a corporation does not:

(a)  transfer title to the corporation's property;

(b)  prevent transfer of its shares or securities, although the authorization to dissolve may provide for closing the corporation's share transfer records;

(c)  subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Part 8;

(d)  change:

(i)  quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or shareholders;

(ii)  provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or

(iii)  provisions for amending its bylaws or its articles of incorporation;

(e)  prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

(f)  abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

(g)  terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

